Washington statutes.
RCW 36.24.110

Form of warrant.

NOTES:

Reviser's note: RCW 36.24.110 was amended by 2016 c 202 s 29 without reference to its repeal by 2016 c 186 s 2. It has been decodified for publication purposes under RCW 1.12.025.